Maryland, session 2026, HB1501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
SUBTITLE 14. HOMELESS SHELTER CERTIFICATION.
6–1401.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1501*

HOUSE BILL 1501
(B) “DISASTER OR HAZARD EMERGENCY SHELTER” MEANS A TEMPORARY
SHELTER THAT IS A PART OF A COUNTY’S EMERGENCY OPERATIONS PLAN AND THAT
OPENS AT A SPECIFIC TEMPERATURE DESIGNATION, DURING INCLEMENT WEATHER,
OR DUE TO A NATURAL DISASTER OR HAZARD.
(C) (1) “HOMELESS SHELTER” MEANS A FACILITY THAT IS OPERATED
FOR THE PRIMARY PURPOSE OF PROVIDING TEMPORARY OVERNIGHT SLEEPING
ACCOMMODATIONS, MEALS, BASIC NEEDS ASSISTANCE, AND SUPPORTIVE SERVICES
FOR CASE MANAGEMENT AND HOUSING NAVIGATION TO HOMELESS INDIVIDUALS.
(2) “HOMELESS SHELTER” INCLUDES:
(I) A YEAR–ROUND SHELTER;
(II) A SAFE HAVEN SHELTER;
(III) A TRANSITIONAL SHELTER;
(IV) A SEASONAL EMERGENCY SHELTER; AND
(V) A DISASTER OR HAZARD EMERGENCY SHELTER OR
EMERGENCY MASS CARE SHELTER.
(D) “MEDICAL OR SPECIALIZED CARE SHELTER” MEANS A YEAR–ROUND
SHELTER THAT PROVIDES A HIGHER LEVEL OF CARE TO MEET THE UNIQUE HEALTH
CARE, PERSONAL CARE, ACTIVITIES OF DAILY LIVING, OR MOBILITY NEEDS OF
SHELTER RESIDENTS.
(E) “MOTEL– OR HOTEL–BASED SHELTER” MEANS A MOTEL OR HOTEL USED
TO SUPPLEMENT TRADITIONAL SHELTER OPTIONS WHEN SHELTERS ARE FULL OR
WHEN A FAMILY HAS INDIVIDUAL NEEDS THAT MAKE A TRADITIONAL SHELTER AN
UNSAFE OR UNVIABLE OPTION.
(F) “SAFE HAVEN SHELTER” MEANS A SUPPORTIVE SHELTER FUNDED BY
THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT THAT PROVIDES
A 24–HOUR RESIDENCE FOR HOMELESS INDIVIDUALS WITH SEVERE MENTAL
ILLNESS.
(G) “SEASONAL EMERGENCY SHELTER” MEANS A CONGREGATE OR
DORM–STYLE SHELTER WITH BEDS OR WHOLE FACILITIES THAT OPEN FOR AN
ENTIRE SEASON OR FOR A PREDETERMINED TIME PERIOD BUT ARE NOT PART OF
THE COUNTY’S EMERGENCY OPERATIONS PLAN.

HOUSE BILL 1501 3
(H) “TRANSITIONAL SHELTER” MEANS A SHELTER THAT TYPICALLY
PROVIDES ACCOMMODATIONS FOR UP TO 2 YEARS.
(I) “YEAR–ROUND SHELTER” MEANS A SHELTER THAT IS OPEN
YEAR–ROUND AND HAS RESIDENTS OCCUPYING THE SHELTER EVERY NIGHT,
INCLUDING A SAFE HAVEN SHELTER, TRANSITIONAL SHELTER, AND MEDICAL OR
SPECIALIZED CARE SHELTER.
6–1402.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL OPERATE A CERTIFICATION PROGRAM FOR
HOMELESS SHELTERS.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A TIERED SYSTEM FOR HOMELESS
SHELTER CERTIFICATIONS BASED ON:
(1) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS SERVED BY THE HOMELESS
SHELTER;
(2) THE TYPE AND DURATION OF SHELTER PROVIDED; AND
(3) THE TYPE AND INTENSITY OF SERVICES PROVIDED.
(C) THE TIERED SYSTEM REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL PRIORITIZE THE CERTIFICATION OF HOMELESS SHELTERS IN THE
FOLLOWING ORDER:
(1) YEAR–ROUND SHELTERS, INCLUDING SAFE HAVEN SHELTERS,
TRANSITIONAL SHELTERS, OR MEDICAL OR SPECIALIZED CARE SHELTERS;
(2) SEASONAL SHELTERS;
(3) MOTEL– OR HOTEL–BASED SHELTERS; AND
(4) OTHER SHELTERS.
6–1403.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A STAGGERED APPROVAL
TIMELINE TO ENSURE THAT HOMELESS SHELTER CERTIFICATION APPLICATIONS
ARE PROCESSED EFFICIENTLY, QUALITY SITE VISITS AND INSPECTIONS ARE
CONDUCTED, TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE IS PROVIDED TO SHELTER OPERATORS, AND
CERTIFICATIONS ARE ISSUED IN A TIMELY MANNER.

HOUSE BILL 1501
(B) THE STAGGERED APPROVAL PROCESS SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) NOTIFYING OPERATORS OF EXISTING HOMELESS SHELTERS OF
EACH SHELTER’S CLASSIFICATION UNDER § 6–1402 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) ASSIGNING HOMELESS SHELTERS INTO COHORTS; AND
(3) ASSIGNING APPLICATION AND CERTIFICATION DEADLINES.
(C) A HOMELESS SHELTER MAY NOT OPERATE WITHOUT A HOMELESS
SHELTER CERTIFICATION AFTER THE APPLICABLE CERTIFICATION DEADLINE HAS
PASSED.
6–1404.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH REQUIREMENTS FOR EACH HOMELESS
SHELTER CERTIFICATION CLASS THAT INCLUDE:
(1) REQUIREMENTS FOR ORGANIZATIONAL, INCORPORATION, AND
GOVERNANCE DOCUMENTS;
(2) REQUIREMENTS FOR FISCAL, ADMINISTRATIVE, AND LEGAL
DOCUMENTS;
(3) OVERSIGHT VISIT AND INSPECTION REQUIREMENTS;
(4) INTERIM UPDATE REPORT REQUIREMENTS;
(5) PROCEDURES FOR THE RENEWAL OF A HOMELESS SHELTER
CERTIFICATION;
(6) SUBMISSION METHODS FOR APPLICATIONS AND REPORTS;
(7) CIRCUMSTANCES FOR THE CONDITIONAL APPROVAL OF A
HOMELESS SHELTER CERTIFICATION;
(8) GROUNDS FOR THE DENIAL, SUSPENSION, OR REVOCATION OF A
HOMELESS SHELTER CERTIFICATION; AND
(9) PENALTIES FOR A HOMELESS SHELTER THAT OPERATES WITHOUT
A CERTIFICATION AFTER THE APPLICABLE CERTIFICATION DEADLINE HAS PASSED.

HOUSE BILL 1501 5
6–1405.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PERFORM ON–SITE MONITORING TO
DETERMINE IF A HOMELESS SHELTER MEETS HOMELESS SHELTER CERTIFICATION
REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 6–1404 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A GRIEVANCE
PROCESS FOR HOMELESS INDIVIDUALS AND HOMELESS SHELTER RESIDENTS TO
NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF ALLEGED VIOLATIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.